Utah statutes.
17-23-2.   Office furnishings and supplies -- Filing and indexing fees -- Records remain county property.

(1)  The county shall furnish an office, furniture, and all stationery and record books necessary for the surveyor's office.

(2)  The county legislative body, by ordinance or resolution, may establish the fee to be collected by the county for filing and indexing a map of a survey. Fees for filing of maps under Section 17-23-17 shall be governed by Section 17-23-19.

(3)  All records, maps, plats, profiles, calculations, and field notes of all surveys made by the county surveyor in an official capacity during the surveyor's term of office, or by persons designated by the surveyor to do survey work on behalf of the county, or maps of a survey filed under Section 17-23-17, shall be the property of the county, open to the inspection of any person, and shall be delivered by the surveyor to a successor in office.

